Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 3. Child Support
§ 20-2-304.
Presumptive child support.

Child support shall be expressed in a specific dollar amount. The following child support tables shall be used to determine the total child support obligation considering the combined income of both parents. The appropriate table is based upon the number of children for whom the parents share joint legal responsibility and for whom support is being sought. After the combined net income of both parents is determined it shall be used in the first column of the tables to find the appropriate line from which the total child support obligation of both parents can be computed from the third column. The child support obligation computed from the third column of the tables shall be divided between the parents in proportion to the net income of each. The noncustodial parent’s share of the joint child support obligation shall be paid to the custodial parent through the clerk as defined by W.S. 20-6-102(a)(x):

One (1) child:

Net Monthly Income of Both Parents Percentage of Income Allocated For One Child Base Support Plus Marginal Percentage $846.00 22.0 $186.00 + 21.3% over $846.00 $2,961.00 21.5 $637.00 + 14.3% over $2,961.00 $4,652.00 18.9 $879.00 + 11.8% over $4,652.00 $5,498.00 17.8 $979.00 + 10.2% over $5,498.00 $7,613.00 15.7 $1,195.00 + 9.3% over $7,613.00 $10,151.00 14.1 $1,431.00 + 7.5% over $10,151.00 $12,900.00 12.7 $1,638.00 + 5.9% of anything over $12,900.00

Click to view

Two (2) children:

Net Monthly Income of Both Parents Percentage of Income Allocated For Two Children Base Support Plus Marginal Percentage $ 846.00 32.9 $278.00 + 32.8% over $846.00 $2,961.00 32.8 $971.00 + 20.7% over $2,961.00 $4,652.00 28.4 $1,321.00 + 17.4% over $4,652.00 $5,498.00 26.7 $1,468.00 + 15.2% over $5,498.00 $7,613.00 23.5 $1,789.00 + 14.3% over $7,613.00 $10,151.00 21.2 $2,152.00 + 10.4% over $10,151.00 $12,900.00 18.9 $2,438.00 + 9.5% of anything over $12,900.00

Click to view

Three (3) children:

Net Monthly Income of Both Parents Percentage of Income Allocated For Three Children Base Support Plus Marginal Percentage $846.00 40.2 $340.00 + 39.4% over $846.00 $2,961.00 39.6 $1,173.00 + 23.9% over $2,961.00 $4,652.00 33.9 $1,577.00 + 20.9% over $4,652.00 $5,498.00 31.9 $1,754.00 + 17.9% over $5,498.00 $7,613.00 28.0 $2,132.00 + 16.8% over $7,613.00 $10,151.00 25.2 $2,558.00 + 11.6% over $10,151.00 $12,900.00 22.3 $2,877.00 + 11.6% of anything over $12,900.00

Click to view

Four (4) children:

Net Monthly Income of Both Parents Percentage of Income Allocated For Four Children Base Support Plus Marginal Percentage $846.00 44.9 $380.00 + 43.9% over $846.00 $2,961.00 44.2 $1,309.00 + 26.8% over $2,961.00 $4,652.00 37.9 $1,763.00 + 22.9% over $4,652.00 $5,498.00 35.6 $1,957.00 + 20.1% over $5,498.00 $7,613.00 31.3 $2,383.00 + 18.5% over $7,613.00 $10,151.00 28.1 $2,852.00 + 13.1% over $10,151.00 $12,900.00 24.9 $3,212.00 + 13.0 % of anything over $12,900.00

Click to view

Five (5) or more children:

Net Monthly Income of Both Parents Percentage of Income Allocated For Five or More Children Base Support Plus Marginal Percentage $846.00 49.4 $418.00 + 48.3% over $846.00 $2,961.00 48.6 $1,439.00 + 29.6% over $2,961.00 $4,652.00 41.7 $1,940.00 + 24.8% over $4,652.00 $5,498.00 39.1 $2,150.00 + 22.2% over $5,498.00 $7,613.00 34.4 $2,619.00 + 20.4% over $7,613.00 $10,151.00 30.9 $3,137.00 + 14.5% over $10,151.00 $12,900.00 27.4 $3,535.00 + 14.3% of anything over $12,900.00

Click to view

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 42, § 2.

When each parent keeps the children overnight for more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the year and both parents contribute substantially to the expenses of the children in addition to the payment of child support, a shared responsibility child support obligation shall be determined by multiplying the parents’ total child support obligation as derived from subsection (a) of this section by one hundred fifty percent (150%). After the shared responsibility child support obligation is determined, that amount shall be divided between the parents in proportion to the net income of each. The proportionate share of the total obligation of each parent shall then be multiplied by the percentage of time the children spend with the other parent to determine the theoretical support obligation owed to the other parent. The parent owing the greater amount of child support shall pay the difference between the two (2) amounts as the net child support obligation.

When each parent has physical custody of at least one (1) of the children, a shared responsibility child support obligation for all of the children shall be determined by use of the tables. The shared responsibility child support amount shall be divided by the number of children to determine the presumptive support obligation for each child, which amount shall then be allocated to each parent based upon the number of those children in the physical custody of that parent. That sum shall be multiplied by the percentage that the other parent’s net income bears to the total net income of both parents. The obligations so determined shall then be offset, with the parent owing the larger amount paying the difference between the two (2) amounts to the other parent as a net child support obligation.

If a proportion of a support obligor’s social security or veteran’s benefit is paid directly to the custodian of the obligor’s dependents who are the subject of the child support order, the total amount of the social security or veteran’s benefit, including the amounts paid to the obligor and custodian under the child support order, shall be counted as gross income to the obligor. However, in determining the support amount, the amount of the social security or veteran’s benefit sent directly to the custodian shall be subtracted from the obligor’s share of presumptive support. If the subtraction of the social security or veteran’s benefit sent directly to the custodian results in a negative dollar amount, the support amount shall be set at zero. The child support obligation shall be offset by the amount of the social security or veteran’s benefit sent directly to the custodian, beginning from the time the custodian began receiving the social security or veteran’s benefit. The obligor or the department of family services may apply to the court to receive a credit against arrears for any social security or veteran’s benefits that are paid retroactively to the custodian. For purposes of this subsection, “custodian” means the custodian of dependent children under a child support order and the physical custodian of dependent children who are the subject of a child support order.

If the difference between the obligor’s net income and the self-support reserve is less than the support obligation as calculated from the tables in subsection (a) of this section, the support obligation shall be set using the difference between the obligor’s net income and the self-support reserve. As used in this subsection “self-support reserve” means the current poverty line for one (1) person as specified by the poverty guidelines updated periodically in the Federal Register by the United States department of health and human services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 225, § 1; Laws 1990, ch. 60, § 2; Laws 1993, ch. 184, § 1; Laws 1994, ch. 89, § 1; Laws 1995, ch. 174, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

20-6-304

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2; 2005, ch. 12, § 1; 2013 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 42, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, increased the net monthly income amounts, the percentage of income allocated, and the base support in the tables in (a); in (b), substituted “eight hundred thirty-three dollars ($833.00)” for “seven hundred thirty-two dollars ($732.00)”; and added (e).

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment, by ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “as defined by
W.S. 20-6-102(a)(x)” for “of court” in (a).

The second
2013 amendment, by ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, changed the values in all the tables in (a); and in (b), substituted “eight hundred forty-six dollars ($846.00)” for “eight hundred thirty-three dollars ($833.00),” and added “twenty-two percent (22%) of net income for one (1) child and” and “for two (2) or more children.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, substituted “shared responsibility child” for “joint presumptive” or similar language throughout (c) and (d); in (c), substituted “more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the year” for “more than forty percent (40%) of the year,” “determined by multiplying the parents' total child support obligation as derived from subsection (a) of this section by one hundred fifty percent (150%). After” for “determined by use of the tables. After,” and “obligation is determined, that amount” for “obligation is derived from column three of the tables, that amount”; and added (f).

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 42, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (b), which read: “Where the combined income of the custodial parent and the noncustodial parent is less than eight hundred forty-six dollars ($846.00), the support obligation of the noncustodial parent shall be twenty-two percent (22%) of net income for one (1) child and twenty-five percent (25%) of net income for two (2) or more children, but in no case shall the support obligation be less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per month for each family unit in which there are children to whom the noncustodial parent owes a duty of support.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

No relief based on claim of unconstitutionality.—

Father was not entitled to relief based on his claim that this section was unconstitutional because he advocated for the $50 child support order in his proposed divorce decree and the cases he relied on from New York and Washington, wherein the courts declared their respective states’ mandatory minimum child support obligations unconstitutional because they were irrebuttable and therefore conflicted with federal law, were decided before the divorce decree was entered and the father provided no justification for not raising that argument prior to the divorce decree. Webb v. Wyo. ex rel. Dep't of Family Servs., Child Support Enf't Div., 2020 WY 111, 471 P.3d 289,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2020).

Proper calculation. —

District court did not exceed the bounds of reason when it found a father was not voluntarily underemployed on the basis that he earned less money at his new job than he made while operating a lawn care business because the father closed a business for various reasons, testifying that his new job allowed him to fully exercise visitation with his children; the business was failing, and the father could not independently revive a failing business and parent his four children as a single father. Edwards v. Edwards, 2020 WY 35, 459 P.3d 448,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2020).

Reliance on confidential financial affidavit.—

Mother’s testimony was consistent with her confidential financial affidavit (CFA), which had sufficient required supporting documentation, and the district court did not abuse its discretion in relying on the CFA to calculate her monthly income; mother’s updated CFA listed her hourly rate at $ 13.50 and her weekly hours at approximately 27 hours, which was consistent with her testimony, and father’s bald assertion that her testimony reflected a much higher income was not supported by the record. Bruce v. Bruce, 2021 WY 38, 482 P.3d 328,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2021).

Support to be calculated under the guidelines. —

In the parties' divorce, the trial court erred in calculating the child support for the parties' adult disabled daughter because it failed to follow the statutory procedure, which required that such support be calculated under the guidelines. Bagley v. Bagley, 2013 WY 126, 311 P.3d 141,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2013).

Calculation should be presumptive amount. —

Calculation of a father's child support obligation under this section was clearly incorrect as the net income figures specified represented a substantial decrease in the father's income and a substantial increase in the mother's income, yet the trial court increased the father's child support obligation; the trial court was ordered to arrive at a support calculation that complied with the statutory tables. Walker v. Walker, 2013 WY 132, 311 P.3d 170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2013).

Proper calculation. —

District court, which used the father's federal tax information to ascertain his income and added depreciation back to the adjusted gross income figure on the father's return, acted within its discretion in calculating the father's net income as it did for child support purposes; the district court correctly calculated the presumptive level of support by considering the parties' most recent income information as representative of their current earning ability, consistent with case law. Ackerman v. Ott, 2014 WY 93, 330 P.3d 271,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2014).

It was not an abuse of discretion to order a father to pay child support when the father had not filed a required financial affidavit because (1) the court had sufficient other evidence of the parties' finances, and (2) the father could not complain on appeal of the father's disregard of statutory requirements. Peak v. Peak, 2016 WY 109, 383 P.3d 1084,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2016).

Federal tax return inappropriate for determining child support. —

Because federal income tax computations differ in significant respects from the computations required by former §

20-6-301

(now

20-2-303

), the district court erred in substituting the federal income tax concepts to arrive at the presumptive child support amounts under this section. Houston v. Smith, 882 P.2d 240,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1994).

But there is no per se prohibition in using federal tax return to determine child support. —

It was not an abuse of discretion for the trial court, under this section, to use the most recent tax returns for determining income; defendant father's tax refund could be considered as affecting cash flow. Ready v. Ready, 2003 WY 121, 76 P.3d 836,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2003).

Deviation from presumptive support.—

District court did not abuse its discretion when it did not allow a downward deviation from a father’s presumptive child support because the father failed to establish that the father contributed substantially to the expenses of the children of the father and the mother. Marquis v. Marquis, 2020 WY 141, 476 P.3d 212,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2020).

Factors prior to enactment of section to be considered. —

The enactment of this section has not obviated the court's need to consider those factors it previously considered when determining whether child support was warranted; i.e., the child's welfare, the paying parent's ability to pay, the recipient's spending habits, and all other surrounding circumstances. Pauling v. Pauling, 837 P.2d 1073,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1992).

Social security dependency benefits properly considered. —

Because dependency benefits represent an amount earned through a parent's contributions to the social security program, it is proper to include those amounts in the disabled parent's income. Groenstein v. Groenstein, 2005 WY 6, 104 P.3d 765,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2005).

Alimony not included in income determination. —

Monthly alimony payments should not be included in a spouse's income for purposes of determining his/her share of a joint child support obligation. The policy behind an award of alimony is to provide the dependent spouse with a standard of living comparable to what that spouse enjoyed during the term of the marriage, not to support the children. Triggs v. Triggs, 920 P.2d 653,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Previously divided assets. —

Contemplation of previously divided assets a second time, as income for purposes of post-decree child support adjustment is inequitable and violative of the rule announced in Klatt v. Klatt, 654 P.2d 733,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 413

(Wyo. 1982).Bollig v. Bollig, 919 P.2d 136,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1996).

District court incorrectly considered the father's receipt of previously divided marital property as income. Bollig v. Bollig, 919 P.2d 136,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1996).

Overnight visitation. —

In a child support case, a district court did not abuse its discretion by ordering a father to pay less than the statutory presumptive amount because he had necessary child day care costs, the father had the children for a substantial period of time, and he paid his share of uncovered medical expenses. However, the father did not have the children overnight for 40 percent of the time. Dellit v. Tracy, 2015 WY 153, 362 P.3d 353,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2015).

Rebuttable presumption.—

District court properly denied a father’s motion for relief from an income withholding order because his motion requested that his child support obligation be vacated, he presented no argument that the order, itself, was improper, that Wyoming’s statutory approach to setting child support included an irrebuttable presumption, and did not present a record that would enable review of his claim, the court’s findings—which considered the needs of the children and the timing of the father’s release from prison—did not support an argument that the court applied an irrebuttable presumption, and it was arguable that the statute at issue created a rebuttable presumption of $50 per month minimum child support when read in conjunction with another section. MSC, II v. MCG, 2019 WY 59, 442 P.3d 662,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2019).

Lack of visitation and negative feelings not to be considered. —

Lack of visitation and negative feelings between a noncustodial parent and child are not proper factors that a court may consider in determining whether to deviate from the presumptive support guidelines; such consideration is, therefore, an abuse of discretion. Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

In a mother's action to modify child support under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-311

, a district court abused its discretion when it determined that the magnitude of the negative feelings and the extent of the alienation that had occurred between a father and his adult son warranted a downward deviation of half the presumptive child support under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

20-2-304

and 20-2-307(a).
Steele v. Neeman, 2009 WY 58, 206 P.3d 384,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2009).

Pre-statutory child support agreements not necessarily changed. —

Child support agreements made prior to the enactment of the statutory child support guidelines do not necessarily have to be changed simply because of the enactment of the statutory guidelines. Roberts v. Roberts, 816 P.2d 1293,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1991).

But original agreement weighed against statutory factors. —

In making its determination as to whether to deviate from the child support guidelines, the court may consider the list of factors under former §

20-6-302

(now

20-2-307

) and the parties' original agreement and weigh their relevance. Roberts v. Roberts, 816 P.2d 1293,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1991).

No joint obligation absent joint “substantial contribution.” —

A parent who keeps the children overnight the required percentage of the year and pays a child support obligation has not satisfied the three requirements of subsection (d). Evidence must also support a finding that both parents substantially contributed to the expenses of the children. The legislative intent to encourage both parents' involvement in the financial maintenance of their children requires this degree of participation. Cranston v. Cranston, 879 P.2d 345,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1994).

Order directing a father to pay a mother $680 per month in child support was proper because the joint custody child support provision in the statute did not apply as the father's contribution was not substantial and he was, instead, entitled to a downward deviation from the presumptive child support amount for his additional contribution.
Lee v. Lee, 2013 WY 76, 303 P.3d 1128,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2013).

Children from later marriage relevant to support determination. —

In a child support modification suit brought on behalf of a child from the noncustodial parent's first marriage, the court was correct when it held that the children born to the petitioner's later marriage should not be factored into the child support guidelines matrix set forth in this section. However, the court erred when it concluded that it had to strictly apply the guidelines set forth in this section and could not take into consideration the parent's later-born minor children for purposes of determining the modification award, as the court may consider responsibility for later born children pursuant to former § 20-6-302(b)(iv) (now

20-2-307

). Hasty v. Hasty, 828 P.2d 94,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1992).

District court properly modified child support because it did not abuse its discretion in deviating from the presumptive child support amount; once the district determined that deviation was appropriate based on the father’s obligation to a later-born child from his subsequent marriage, nothing prevented it from calculating the appropriate support obligation by considering the presumptive amount for all of the father’s children. TSR v. State ex rel. Dep't of Family Servs., 2017 WY 144, 406 P.3d 729,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2017).

Upper scale for upwardly varying future income. —

The court properly set an upper scale of $2,000 per month for child support, based on a theory that the parent's income might vary upwardly in the future. Madison v. Madison, 859 P.2d 1276,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1993).

Rebuttable presumption that modification is warranted created. —

Rather than requiring courts to modify existing support awards, former § 20-6-306(a) (now see

20-2-311

), in conjunction with subsection (a) of this section and former §

20-6-302

(now 20-3-307), created a rebuttable presumption that modification would be warranted when application of the guidelines would result in a 20% change in the monthly support award; this rebuttable presumption applies not only when child support is initially awarded, but also when a support award is modified. Pauling v. Pauling, 837 P.2d 1073,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1992); Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

Slight deviation from guidelines permissible. —

A court's deviation of $25.81 less than that provided in an award pursuant to this section was permissible, despite the lack of written or specific findings on the record to account for the deviation, as required by former § 20-6-302(b) (now

20-2-307

). Dowdy v. Dowdy, 864 P.2d 439,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1993).

Deviation allowed where parties agree to amount. —

The trial court did not abuse its discretion in not following the child support guidelines in this section in an instance in which the parties had agreed upon the amount of child support; the court found good cause to deviate from the presumptive amounts established by the statutory formula, and it did not modify the amount of child support in response to the father's petition. Smith v. Smith, 895 P.2d 37,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1995).

Deviation from presumptive support. —

Trial court did not err in ordering child support to end when the child became 18 and in having deviated from the presumptive support level; although the parties were not aware of their son's learning disability at the time that the divorce decree, that decree stated support would end once each child reached the age of 18, and the mother had forgiven the child support arrearages owed to her by the father.
Shelhamer v. Shelhamer, 2006 WY 83, 138 P.3d 665,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2006).

District court’s order sufficiently indicated the reason for its departure from the presumptive child support amount because the order clearly provided that the downward deviation from presumptive child support was based on the father’s responsibility for the support of a later-born child from a subsequent marriage; The district court’s decision clearly indicates that applying the presumptive child support guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate. TSR v. State ex rel. Dep't of Family Servs., 2017 WY 144, 406 P.3d 729,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2017).

Failure to comply with statutory requirements. —

Child support
order was erroneous because the order contained no findings with regard
to the parties' incomes, which was necessary for calculating presumptive
child support in accordance with the statute; hence, it was necessary
to remand the case to the district court. JKS v. AHF (In re ARF), 2013 WY 97, 307 P.3d 852,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2013).

Although the district court was privy to information regarding the husband’s finances that would allow it to reach a decision about child support, and the husband’s failure to file a financial affidavit did not render the stipulated decree problematic with respect to child support, the fact that the district court did not acknowledge the presumptive child support amount did; further, the order originally establishing the amount of child support could not be relied upon as that order also failed to state the presumptive amount, and it did not give any indication as to how the court reached the $2,500 per month calculation. Long v. Long, 2018 WY 26, 413 P.3d 117,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2018).

Material circumstantial change warrants modification of agreement. —

When the amount of child support is set by agreement, the party seeking modification must demonstrate a material change in circumstances other than a 20 percent departure from the statutory guidelines. Smith v. Smith, 895 P.2d 37,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1995).

Change from shared to primary custody created rebuttable presumption that modification warranted. —

In a child support action, a district court erred by failing to modify child support in a proceeding commenced after a change from shared custody to primary custody with the mother. Pursuant to the presumptive child support guidelines, the father should have been required to pay 20 percent more than he had been required to pay under the previous order. McCulloh v. Drake, 2005 WY 18, 105 P.3d 1091,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2005).

Father failed to establish that he “contributed substantially” to expenses of children

where he provided evidence of only nominal contributions, including child care costs and magazine subscriptions. He offered no evidence that he had increased expenses for a larger apartment or home to provide the children with living space while they were in his custody; no evidence of increased food, heating or utility expenses while the children were in his custody; and no evidence of providing for the needs of the children with clothing, toys or other necessities at any time. Cranston v. Cranston, 879 P.2d 345,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1994) (decided prior to 1994 amendment).

District court did not err in declining to apply shared custody provision where father failed to show a substantial contribution to his daughter's expenses. Fountain v. Mitros, 968 P.2d 934,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. Jan. 5, 1999).

Child support to be paid where reasonably possible. —

Since child support obligations are specifically designated in §

7-16-205

, it is clear that the legislature intended they be paid where reasonably possible, and where prisoner made no credible showing that payment of his minimal child support would deprive him of necessities during his prison incarceration, the court did not abuse its discretion in ordering the prisoner to pay child support. Glenn v. Glenn, 848 P.2d 819,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1993).

Shared custody arrangements. —

Where the court directed that the husband and wife will alternate the child's physical care every four months, each parent was entitled to receive presumptive support for the periods that he or she had the child overnight for more than forty percent of the year, to be determined by use of the tables. Raymond v. Raymond, 956 P.2d 329,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1998).

It was error, based on a prior visitation schedule, to deny a father's
request to reduce the father's child support obligation by calculating
the obligation pursuant to
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-304(c) because the father showed (1) each party had custody
of the parties' child over 40 percent of a year, (2) the calculation
reduced the father's child support obligation over 20 percent, and
(3) the father contributed substantially to the child's expenses,
but child support was not reduced since the father did not meet the
40 or 20 percent requirements under a new visitation schedule that
was approved.
Jensen v. Milatzo-Jensen, 2013 WY 27, 297 P.3d 768,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2013).

Order granting
a mother physical custody but granting a father liberal visitation
was not a mistake due to granting the father de facto shared custody,
because (1) each parent's time with the children was not approximately
50% in a given year, and (2) Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-304(c) did not apply. Loran v. Loran, 2015 WY 24, 343 P.3d 400,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2015).

Ordering joint
presumptive child support was an abuse of discretion because no required
finding that each parent contributed substantially to the children's
expenses in addition to paying child support was made. Loran v. Loran, 2015 WY 24, 343 P.3d 400,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2015).

District court
did not err in failing to apply joint presumptive child support because
a parent did not have the parties' child overnight for forty percent
of the year. Wright v. Wright, 2015 WY 37, 344 P.3d 267,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2015), reh'g denied,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. Apr. 7, 2015).

Incarcerated parent's assets or income applied toward child support. —

If an incarcerated parent does have assets or income while in prison, that income can properly be applied against that parent's outstanding support obligation. Glenn v. Glenn, 848 P.2d 819,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1993).

Denial of visitation rights not change in circumstances. —

The denial of visitation rights by either the custodial parent or the child does not constitute a change in circumstances justifying the reduction or termination of the noncustodial parent's support obligation. A child's need for support and a parent's ability to pay are not related to questions concerning visitation. Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

Insufficient financial information. —

Motion to set aside the default divorce decree should have been granted under W.R.C.P. 60(b) because the trial court failed to base its findings of fact in accordance with W.R.C.P. 55(b)(2) regarding property distribution, child custody, visitation, and support on some evidence in the record, and the trial court did not comply with the dictates of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-308(a) by obtaining sufficient financial evidence of both parties' income to make factual determinations, to comply with the presumptive child support guidelines found in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-304

, or to determine whether to deviate from those guidelines under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-307

. Noonan v. Noonan, 2005 WY 145, 122 P.3d 964,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2005).

Applied

in

Smith v. Smith, 863 P.2d 624,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1993); Goody v. Goody, 939 P.2d 731,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1997); Fleenor v. Fleenor, 992 P.2d 1065,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1999); Durham v. Durham, 2003 WY 95, 74 P.3d 1230,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted

in

Esponda v. Esponda, 796 P.2d 799,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1990);
Donnelly v. Donnelly, 2004 WY 72, 92 P.3d 298,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(2004); Carbaugh v. Nichols, 2014 WY 2, 315 P.3d 1175,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 2

, 2014 WL 31325 (Jan 6, 2014).

Cited

in

Kidd v. Kidd, 832 P.2d 566,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1992); Underkofler v. Underkofler, 834 P.2d 1140,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1992); Wright v. Wright, 5 P.3d 61,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2000); Davidson v. Carrillo, 2014 WY 65,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(May 22, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Child Support and Social Security Dependent Benefits: a Comprehensive Analysis and Proposal for Wyoming,” see 2 Wyo. L. Rev. 39 (2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Loss of income due to incarceration as affecting child support obligation, 27 ALR5th 540.

§ 20-2-305.
Abatements. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1; 2003, ch. 25, § 1; 2005, ch. 204, § 1; 2014 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; repealed by 2018 ch. 42, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 20-2-306.
Revision of presumptive child support.

On or before December 1, 1996, and at least once every four (4) years thereafter, the department of family services shall review the presumptive child support established under this article to ensure that application results in the determination of appropriate child support award amounts.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 225, § 1; Laws 1990, ch. 60, § 2; Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 3; Laws 1993, ch. 184, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

20-6-305

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2; 2008, ch. 44, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted “and shall submit a report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and shall recommend any proposed changes” at the end.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”